Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-27,216
Application for hearing; adjustment to debt.

A written application pursuant to section 77-27,215 by a debtor for a hearing shall be effective upon receipt of the application by the Department of Motor Vehicles. If the department receives a timely written application contesting its claim to a refund, it shall grant a hearing to the taxpayer to determine whether the claim is valid. If the amount asserted as due and owing is not correct, an adjustment to the claimed amount shall be made. No hearing shall be granted upon issues which have been finally determined.

Laws 1997, LB 720, § 31.